Maryland, session 2025, SB0978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–601.
(a) Permits issued by the Department under the following sections shall be issued
in accordance with this subtitle:
(1) Air quality control permits to construct subject to § 2–404 of this article;
(2) Permits to install, materially alter, or materially extend landfill
systems, incinerators for public use, or rubble landfills subject to § 9–209 of this article;
(3) Permits to discharge pollutants to waters of the State issued [pursuant
to] IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–323 of this article;
(4) Permits to install, materially alter, or materially extend a structure
used for storage or distribution of any type of sewage sludge issued, renewed, or amended
[pursuant to] IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–234.1 or § 9–238 of this article;
(5) Permits to own, operate, establish, or maintain a controlled hazardous
substance facility issued [pursuant to] IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–232 of this article;
(6) Permits to own, operate, or maintain a hazardous material facility
issued [pursuant to] IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–103 of this article;
(7) Permits to own, operate, establish, or maintain a low–level nuclear
waste facility issued [pursuant to] IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–233 of this article; [and]
(8) Potable reuse permits issued in accordance with § 9–303.2 of this
article; AND
(9) PERMITS FOR PROJECTS IDENTIFIED UNDER § 1–703 OF THIS
TITLE AS HAVING AN INCREASED POTENTIAL FOR ADVERSE COMMUNITY
ENVIRONMENTAL AND PUBLIC HEALTH IMPACTS.
1–601.1.

SENATE BILL 978 3
(a) A person applying for a permit listed under § 1–601(a) of this subtitle shall
include in the permit application the EJ Score from the Maryland EJ tool for the census
tract where the applicant is seeking a permit, unless the permit requires the applicant to
use a tool developed by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
(b) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, A PERSON APPLYING FOR A NEW, RENEWAL, OR EXPANSION PERMIT FOR A
PROJECT IDENTIFIED UNDER § 1–703 OF THIS TITLE AS HAVING AN INCREASED
POTENTIAL FOR ADVERSE COMMUNITY ENVIRONMENTAL AND PUBLIC HEALTH
IMPACTS SHALL INCLUDE IN THE PERMIT APPLICATION AN ENVIRONMENTAL
IMPACT ANALYSIS THAT INCLUDES:
(1) A DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPOSED PERMIT AND THE
ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS OF THE SITE;
(2) THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND PUBLIC HEALTH IMPACTS OF THE
PROPOSED PERMIT, DETAILING BOTH SHORT– AND LONG– TERM EFFECTS;
(3) ANY ALTERNATIVES TO THE PROPOSED PERMIT;
(4) ANY IRREVERSIBLE OR IRRETRIEVABLE COMMITMENT OF
RESOURCES INVOLVED IN THE PROPOSED PERMIT;
(5) MITIGATION MEASURES PROPOSED TO MINIMIZE IDENTIFIED
ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS; AND
(6) IF APPLICABLE, A PROPOSED EXISTING BURDEN REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER § 1–704 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) On receiving an application for a permit listed under § 1–601(a) of this
subtitle, the Department shall, in accordance with regulations adopted under this section,
review the EJ Score for the census tract where the applicant is seeking a permit using the
Maryland EJ tool to verify the applicant’s information.
[(c)] (D) The Department shall adopt regulations to implement this section.
1–602.
(a) Wherever this subtitle requires the Department to publish notice:
(1) Notice shall be published at least once a week for 2 consecutive weeks
in a daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation in the geographical area in which the
proposed facility is located;
(2) The notice shall include:

SENATE BILL 978
(i) The EJ Score for the census tract where the applicant is seeking
a permit, provided by the applicant under § 1–601.1 of this subtitle;
(ii) The address of the Department website for accessing the EJ
Score review conducted under § 1–601.1 of this subtitle; [and]
(iii) A description of the environmental justice indicators
contributing to the EJ Score of the census tract where the applicant is seeking a permit;
AND
(IV) IF THE PERMIT IS FOR A PROJECT IDENTIFIED UNDER §
1–703 OF THIS TITLE AS HAVING AN INCREASED POTENTIAL FOR ADVERSE
COMMUNITY ENVIRONMENTAL AND PUBLIC HEALTH IMPACTS, THE
ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT ANALYSIS REQUIRED UNDER § 1–601.1(B) OF THIS
SUBTITLE, INCLUDING, IF APPLICABLE, THE PROPOSED EXISTING BURDEN REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER § 1–704 OF THIS TITLE;
(3) The Department may require notice of an informational meeting or a
public hearing by mail to each person requesting the meeting or hearing or to their
authorized representatives;
(4) The Department may provide additional notice by requiring the notice
to be posted at the proposed facility or at public facilities in the geographical area of the
proposed facility; and
(5) The applicant shall bear all costs incurred by the Department in
providing notice.
1–703.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COVERED PROJECT” MEANS AN ACTIVITY OR A
FACILITY TYPE THAT IS ANY:
(1) AGGREGATE MINING OPERATION, INCLUDING GRAVEL MINING;
(2) ANAEROBIC DIGESTER;
(3) CARBON DIOXIDE PIPELINE;
(4) COAL MINE, ACTIVE OR INACTIVE;
(5) CONCENTRATED ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATION;
(6) CONCRETE BATCHING FACILITY;

SENATE BILL 978 5
(7) ENERGY–GENERATING FACILITY, EXCLUDING SOLAR, WIND, AND
GEOTHERMAL FACILITIES;
(8) ENERGY STORAGE SITE, INCLUDING DATA CENTERS AND
HYDROGEN HUBS;
(9) FOSSIL FUEL SHIPMENT, HANDLING, OR PROCESSING FACILITY,
INCLUDING BULK SHIPPING TERMINALS AND ANY COMPONENT OF A FACILITY THAT
PROCESSES OR STORES, OR BOTH, LIQUIFIED NATURAL GAS;
(10) INCINERATOR, INCLUDING INCINERATORS FOR MEDICAL WASTE,
MUNICIPAL SOLID WASTE, ANIMAL WASTE, OR WOODY BIOMASS;
(11) LANDFILL, INCLUDING LANDFILLS THAT ACCEPT ASH,
CONSTRUCTION OR DEMOLITION DEBRIS, OR SOLID WASTE;
(12) MANUFACTURING FACILITY, INCLUDING CHEMICAL
MANUFACTURING;
(13) MATERIALS RECOVERY FACILITY;
(14) MILITARY TESTING AND RESEARCH SITE;
(15) PELLET FACTORY;
(16) REFINERY;
(17) SAWMILL;
(18) SCRAP METAL YARD;
(19) SEWAGE TREATMENT PLANT WITH A CAPACITY OF MORE THAN
50,000,000 GALLONS PER DAY;
(20) SLUDGE PROCESSING FACILITY;
(21) SOLID WASTE TRANSFER STATION; OR
(22) SUPERFUND SITE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL IDENTIFY A COVERED PROJECT AS HAVING
AN INCREASED POTENTIAL FOR ADVERSE COMMUNITY ENVIRONMENTAL AND

SENATE BILL 978
PUBLIC HEALTH IMPACTS IF THE COVERED PROJECT REQUIRES ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING PERMITS:
(1) AIR QUALITY CONTROL PERMITS TO CONSTRUCT, SUBJECT TO §
2–404 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) NATIONAL POLLUTION DISCHARGE ELIMINATION SYSTEM
PERMITS;
(3) PERMITS TO OWN, OPERATE, OR MAINTAIN A HAZARDOUS
MATERIAL FACILITY ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–103 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(4) PERMITS TO OWN, OPERATE, OR MAINTAIN A LOW–LEVEL
NUCLEAR WASTE FACILITY ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–233 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(5) POTABLE REUSE PERMITS ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
9–303.2 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(6) REFUSE DISPOSAL PERMITS;
(7) SEWAGE SLUDGE PERMITS;
(8) STATE–ONLY CONDITIONS ASSOCIATED WITH TITLE V (PART 70)
PERMITS TO OPERATE; OR
(9) STATE PERMITS TO OPERATE MINOR AIR POLLUTION SOURCES
THAT HAVE BEEN IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT AS NEEDING PERMITS TO
OPERATE.
1–704.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AT–RISK CENSUS TRACT” MEANS A CENSUS TRACT FOR WHICH
THE FINAL EJ SCORE FROM THE MARYLAND EJ TOOL IS AT OR ABOVE THE 75TH
PERCENTILE.
(3) “COVERED PROJECT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–703(A) OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) AN APPLICATION FOR A PERMIT LISTED UNDER § 1–703(B)(1)
THROUGH (9) OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR A COVERED PROJECT THAT IS LOCATED

SENATE BILL 978 7
WITHIN A 1.5–MILE RADIUS FROM THE BOUNDARY OF AN AT–RISK CENSUS TRACT
SHALL INCLUDE A PROPOSED EXISTING BURDEN REPORT.
(2) THE PROPOSED EXISTING BURDEN REPORT REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE EJ SCORE FROM THE MARYLAND EJ TOOL FOR THE
CENSUS TRACT WHERE THE APPLICANT IS SEEKING A PERMIT;
(II) A COMPREHENSIVE LIST OF EACH EXISTING POLLUTION
SOURCE, OR CATEGORY OF SOURCES, THAT IS IMPACTING THE COMMUNITY,
INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION OF POTENTIAL ROUTES OF HUMAN EXPOSURE TO
POLLUTION FROM EACH SOURCE OR CATEGORY IDENTIFIED;
(III) AMBIENT CONCENTRATIONS OF REGULATED AIR
POLLUTANTS AND REGULATED OR UNREGULATED HAZARDOUS AIR POLLUTANTS;
(IV) TRAFFIC VOLUME;
(V) GENERAL NOISE AND ODOR LEVELS;
(VI) EXPOSURE OR POTENTIAL EXPOSURE TO LEAD, INCLUDING
LEAD–BASED PAINT;
(VII) EXPOSURE OR POTENTIAL EXPOSURE TO CONTAMINATED
DRINKING WATER SUPPLIES;
(VIII) PROXIMITY OF THE COVERED PROJECT TO EXISTING
SOURCES OF POLLUTION, INCLUDING:
1. SOLID OR HAZARDOUS WASTE SITES;
2. INCINERATORS;
3. RECYCLING FACILITIES;
4. WASTE TRANSFER FACILITIES; AND
5. PETROLEUM OR CHEMICAL MANUFACTURING,
STORAGE, TREATMENT, OR DISPOSAL FACILITIES;
(IX) THE POTENTIAL OR PROJECTED CONTRIBUTION OF THE
COVERED PROJECT TO EXISTING POLLUTION BURDENS IN THE COMMUNITY AND,

SENATE BILL 978
ACCOUNTING FOR THE EXISTING BURDEN, THE POTENTIAL HEALTH EFFECTS OF
ANY CONTRIBUTION;
(X) AN EVALUATION OF EXISTING ENVIRONMENTAL AND
PUBLIC HEALTH STRESSORS BORNE BY THE COMMUNITY; AND
(XI) AN EVALUATION OF ANY UNAVOIDABLE ENVIRONMENTAL
AND PUBLIC HEALTH STRESSORS POSED BY THE COVERED PROJECT.
(C) (1) BEFORE APPROVING A COVERED PROJECT LOCATED WITHIN A
1.5–MILE RADIUS FROM THE BOUNDARY OF AN AT–RISK CENSUS TRACT, THE
DEPARTMENT, OR OTHER PERMITTING AGENCY, SHALL PREPARE, OR CAUSE TO BE
PREPARED, A FINAL EXISTING BURDEN REPORT.
(2) AN EXISTING BURDEN REPORT MAY BE FINALIZED ONLY IF:
(I) THE REPORT HAS BEEN REVIEWED FOR ACCURACY AND
SUFFICIENCY BY:
1. THE COMMISSION;
2. THE DEPARTMENT;
3. THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH;
4. ELECTED OFFICIALS REPRESENTING THE IMPACTED
COMMUNITY; AND
5. ANY OTHER ENVIRONMENTAL OR PUBLIC HEALTH
OFFICIAL THAT THE PERMITTING AGENCY DEEMS APPROPRIATE;
(II) THERE HAS BEEN AN OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT
ON THE EXISTING BURDEN REPORT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS
TITLE; AND
(III) A RECORD OF ALL PUBLIC COMMENT ON THE PROPOSED
EXISTING BURDEN REPORT AND PERMIT APPLICATION HAS BEEN INCORPORATED
INTO THE FINAL EXISTING BURDEN REPORT.
(3) A FINAL EXISTING BURDEN REPORT MAY BE BASED ALL OR IN
PART ON THE PROPOSED EXISTING BURDEN REPORT.

SENATE BILL 978 9
(D) (1) AFTER REVIEW OF THE FINAL EXISTING BURDEN REPORT UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT ANALYSIS UNDER
§ 1–601.1(B) OF THIS TITLE, AND ANY ACCOMPANYING PUBLIC COMMENTS, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE AN OFFICIAL DETERMINATION AS TO WHETHER THE
REPORTS AND PUBLIC COMMENTS INDICATE THAT THE COVERED PROJECT MAY,
DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, CAUSE OR CONTRIBUTE TO AN INCREASED POTENTIAL
FOR ADVERSE COMMUNITY ENVIRONMENTAL AND PUBLIC HEALTH IMPACTS WITHIN
AN AT–RISK CENSUS TRACT.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DENY A PERMIT FOR A COVERED PROJECT IF THE
DEPARTMENT DETERMINES UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT THE
PROJECT WOULD CAUSE OR CONTRIBUTE TO AN INCREASED POTENTIAL FOR
ADVERSE COMMUNITY ENVIRONMENTAL AND PUBLIC HEALTH IMPACTS IN AN
AT–RISK CENSUS TRACT.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY APPROVE A CONDITIONAL NEW,
EXPANSION, OR RENEWAL PERMIT IF THE PERMIT APPLICANT CAN ESTABLISH THAT:
(I) THE PURPOSE OF THE PERMIT WOULD SERVE AN ESSENTIAL
ENVIRONMENTAL, HEALTH, OR SAFETY NEED OF THE COMMUNITY; AND
(II) THERE IS NO REASONABLE ALTERNATIVE TO THE PURPOSE
OF THE PERMIT.
(4) IF THE DEPARTMENT CONDITIONALLY APPROVES AN
APPLICATION FOR A NEW, EXPANSION, OR RENEWAL PERMIT UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) IMPOSE ADDITIONAL PERMIT CONDITIONS TO PROTECT
PUBLIC HEALTH; AND
(II) REQUIRE THE APPLICANT TO ENTER INTO A CUMULATIVE
IMPACTS MITIGATION FUND AGREEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E) OF
THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) A HOLDER OF A PERMIT CONDITIONALLY APPROVED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(4) OF THIS SECTION SHALL ENTER INTO A CUMULATIVE IMPACTS
MITIGATION FUND AGREEMENT WITH A COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION OR
COLLECTION OF COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATIONS REPRESENTING THE
COMMUNITY OR COMMUNITIES AFFECTED BY THE COVERED PROJECT.

SENATE BILL 978
(2) (I) A CUMULATIVE IMPACTS MITIGATION FUND AGREEMENT
SHALL:
1. ESTABLISH ONGOING PAYMENT OF FEES BY THE
PERMIT HOLDER INTO A PROJECT–SPECIFIC CUMULATIVE IMPACTS MITIGATION
FUND FOR THE LIFE OF THE PROJECT;
2. BE ENFORCEABLE IN A STATE COURT, AND INCLUDE
THIS INFORMATION IN THE LANGUAGE OF THE CONTRACT; AND
3. BENEFIT ALL RESIDENTS WHO LIVE WITHIN THE
AT–RISK CENSUS TRACT AFFECTED BY THE PROJECT.
(II) A CUMULATIVE IMPACTS MITIGATION FUND AGREEMENT
MAY NOT RESTRICT THE RIGHT OF RESIDENTS OR ORGANIZATIONS TO EXPRESS
CONCERNS ABOUT OR OBJECTIONS TO THE PROJECT.
1–705.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE INFORMATION READILY AVAILABLE
ONLINE REGARDING ANY ENFORCEMENT ACTION AGAINST A PERMITTED FACILITY
LOCATED WITHIN A 1.5–MILE RADIUS OF THE BOUNDARY OF AN AT–RISK CENSUS
TRACT, INCLUDING NOTICES OF VIOLATIONS IN ADDITION TO PENDING AND
CONCLUDED ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS.
(B) AT LEAST 25% OF THE REVENUE FROM ANY ENFORCEMENT ACTION
AGAINST A FACILITY LOCATED WITHIN A 1.5–MILE RADIUS OF THE BOUNDARY OF AN
AT–RISK CENSUS TRACT SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO A SPECIAL FUND TO BE USED TO
ASSIST AFFECTED COMMUNITIES.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE OPERATION OF THE SPECIAL FUND AND APPROPRIATE
DISTRIBUTION OF THE FUNDS TO COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS WITHIN AFFECTED
COMMUNITIES.
2–405.
(a) (1) (i) Whenever the Public Service Commission notifies the Secretary
of an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity under § 7–207 of the
Public Utilities Article, the Secretary shall prepare a recommendation in connection with
the permit or registration required by this subtitle and the issues the Public Service
Commission must consider under § 7–207 of the Public Utilities Article relating to climate
change.

SENATE BILL 978 11
(ii) The recommendation shall be presented at the hearing required
by § 7–207 of the Public Utilities Article.
(2) The recommendation shall identify the requirements of all applicable
federal and State environmental laws and standards and shall recommend and evaluate
various methods and conditions for compliance.
(3) FOR ANY CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
ISSUED IN LIEU OF AN AIR QUALITY PERMIT TO CONSTRUCT THAT IS SUBJECT TO
THE REQUIREMENT TO PREPARE AN EXISTING BURDEN REPORT UNDER § 1–704 OF
THIS ARTICLE, THE RECOMMENDATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE FINAL EJ SCORE FROM THE MARYLAND EJ TOOL;
(II) THE FINDINGS OF THE EXISTING BURDEN REPORT; AND
(III) MEASURES TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 1–704(E) OF
THIS ARTICLE.
[(3)] (4) If a person files an application for an operating permit under this
subtitle simultaneously with an application for a certificate, the Department shall
consolidate its procedures for the issuance of the operating permit with the Public Service
Commission’s proceedings for issuance of the certificate and shall issue the operating
permit simultaneously with the certificate unless consolidation would be inconsistent with
the procedures set forth in the federal Clean Air Act.
[(4)] (5) The Department shall incorporate into the initial operating
permit the conditions of the certificate which relate to air quality control.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.